apertium-ina.ina.dix
      <pardef n="/esser"> <!-- this should probably not be vblex; if it is, it could be factored -->
        <e><p><l>esser</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>   <!-- esser -->
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ser</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>   <!-- ser -->
        <e><p><l>sia</l><r><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> <!-- sia -->
        <e><p><l>sia</l><r><s n="prs"/></r></p></e> <!-- sia (subj) -->
        <e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>esse</l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>son</l><r><s n="pri"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>so</l><r><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>somos</l><r><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>era</l><r><s n="pii"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>esseva</l><r><s n="pii"/></r></p></e>  <!-- esseva = era, era is preferred -->
        <e><p><l>essera</l><r><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>sera</l><r><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>esserea</l><r><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>serea</l><r><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>essente</l><r><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>essi</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pp"/></e>
        <e><p><l>esse</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pprs"/></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="/haber">  <!-- hard to collapse with vblex paradigms -->
        <e><p><l>haber</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e> <!-- haber -->
        <e><p><l>ha</l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>habe</l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>  <!-- indicative habe (LR because "ha" is prefered)-->
        <e><p><l>habeva</l><r><s n="pii"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>habera</l><r><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>haberea</l><r><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>habi</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pp"/></e>
        <e><p><l>habe</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pprs"/></e>
        <e><p><l>habe</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-subj"/></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="/ir__/vader__vblex">  <!-- hard to collapse with vblex paradigms -->
        <e><p><l>ir</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>vader</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e> <!-- ir = vader -->
        <e><p><l>va</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>vade</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e> <!-- io va = io vade = io i -->
        <e r="RL"><p><l>vade</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p></e> <!-- subj "que io vade" (Using RL for subjunctives, maybe there is a better solution)-->
        <e><p><l>iva</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>vadeva</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p></e> <!-- io iva = io vadeva -->
        <e r="RL"><p><l>vadeva</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/></r></p></e>  <!-- subj "si io vadeva"(Using RL for subjunctives, maybe there is a better solution)-->
        <e><p><l>ira</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>vadera</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e> <!-- io ira = io vadera -->
        <e r="RL"><p><l>vadera</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e> <!-- subj "quando io vadera" (Using RL for subjunctives, maybe there is a better solution)-->
        <e><p><l>irea</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>vaderea</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e> <!-- io irea = io vaderea -->
        <e><p><l>vadente</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>iente</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e> <!-- vadente = iente -->
        <e><p><l>ite</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>vadite</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e> <!-- ite = vadite -->
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="cant/ar__vblex">
        <e><p><l></l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ar-verbs"/></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="cred/er__vblex">
        <e><p><l></l><r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="er-verbs"/></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="fac/er__vblex">
        <e><p><l></l><r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="er-ie-verbs"/></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="part/ir__vblex">
        <e><p><l></l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ir-verbs"/></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="pot/er__vbmod">
        <e><p><l></l><r>er<s n="vbmod"/></r></p><par n="er-verbs"/></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="/haber__vbhaver">
        <e><p><l></l><r>haber<s n="vbhaver"/></r></p><par n="/haber"/></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="/haber__vblex">
        <e><p><l></l><r>haber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="/haber"/></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="/esser__vblex"> <!-- esser vblex in some languages: estar -->
        <e><p><l></l><r>esser<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="/esser"/></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="/esser__vbser">
        <e><p><l></l><r>esser<s n="vbser"/></r></p><par n="/esser"/></e>
      </pardef>

      <!-- END - Verbs - Paradigms -->


      <!-- Punctuation & special - Paradigms -->
      <pardef n="coma">
        <e><re>,</re><p><l></l>       <r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="emails">
        <e><re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="urls">
        <e><re>(http://|https://|ftp://)?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*)*(.[a-z][a-z]|.aero|.asia|.biz|.cat|.com|.coop|.edu|.gov|.info|.int|.jobs|.mil|.mobi|.museum|.name|.net|.org|.pro|.tel|.travel)(/([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*/)*([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*)?)?</re><!--      <re>(((www.)|(http://))[a-z0-9\-]+([.][a-z]+)+(/[a-z0-9_]+)*([.][a-z]+)*)</re> --><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="horas">
        <e><re>[0-2]?[0-9]h[0-6][0-9]</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="hour"/></r></p></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="numeros">
        <e><re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
        <e><re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[ ]?\-[ ]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
        <e><re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[ ]?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
        <e><re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[ ]?\-[ ]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?([ ]?%)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="pardret">
        <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l>  <r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="paresq">
        <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l>  <r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="separ">
        <e><re>¿</re><p><l></l>       <r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="separa">
        <e r="LR"><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="RL"><p><l><a/></l>      <r></r></p><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
      </pardef>

      <!-- END - Punctuation & special - Paradigms -->

    <pardef n="ubi__rel">
      <e><p><l/>                    <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e> 
    </pardef>


     <pardef n="coma">
        <e><re>,</re><p><l></l>       <r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

     <pardef n="emails">
        <e><re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

    <e lm="ubi"><i>ubi</i><par n="ubi__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="esser"><i></i><par n="/esser__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="esser"><i></i><par n="/esser__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="haber"><i></i><par n="/haber__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="haber"><i></i><par n="/haber__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ir"><i></i><par n="/ir__/vader__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="amollir"><i>amoll</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arrestar"><i>arrest</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="assister"><i>assist</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bastir"><i>bast</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="benefacer"><i>benefac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="caper"><i>cap</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="catalogar"><i>catalog</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="concupiscer"><i>concupisc</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="contrafacer"><i>contrafac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="convenir"><i>conven</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cooperar"><i>cooper</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="deber"><i>deb</i><par n="pot/er__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="decider"><i>decid</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="diaphragmar"><i>diaphragm</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disfacer"><i>disfac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disperger"><i>disperg</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disservir"><i>disserv</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disuncar"><i>disunc</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="expender"><i>expend</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="experir"><i>exper</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="faxar"><i>fax</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ignir"><i>ign</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="illuminar"><i>illumin</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inciper"><i>incip</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inferer"><i>infer</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="intonnar"><i>intonn</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="magrir"><i>magr</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="maledicer"><i>maledic</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="malfacer"><i>malfac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="minutiar"><i>minuti</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="misfacer"><i>misfac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pauperisar"><i>pauperis</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="perciper"><i>percip</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="perir"><i>per</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pluver"><i>pluv</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="poter"><i>pot</i><par n="pot/er__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="preconciper"><i>preconcip</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="punctar"><i>punct</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rarefacer"><i>rarefac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="reabsorber"><i>reabsorb</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="reaperir"><i>reaper</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="refacer"><i>refac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rejuvenescer"><i>rejuvenesc</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="relativisar"><i>relativis</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="repavir"><i>repav</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rubescer"><i>rubesc</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sarcir"><i>sarc</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="soler"><i>sol</i><par n="pot/er__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="stupefacer"><i>stupefac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="superofferer"><i>superoffer</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tabuisar"><i>tabuis</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="trair"><i>tra</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tumefacer"><i>tumefac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="voler"><i>vol</i><par n="pot/er__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="volver"><i>volv</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
      <e>                                     <par n="coma"/></e>
      <e>                                     <par n="numeros"/></e>
      <e>                                     <par n="pardret"/></e>
      <e>                                     <par n="paresq"/></e>
      <e>                                     <par n="separ"/></e>
      <e>                                     <par n="separa"/></e>
      <e>                                     <par n="emails"/></e>
      <e>                                     <par n="urls"/></e>
      <e>                                     <par n="horas"/></e>
